New Jersey, session 222, S4343.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.39:3-49 is amended to read as follows: a.     Except as hereinafter in this article provided, every motor vehicle other than a motor-drawn vehicle and other than a [motor cycle] motorcycle shall be equipped with at least [2] two approved headlamps mounted at the same level with an equal number on each side of the front of the vehicle.  Every [motor cycle] motorcycle shall be equipped with at least [1] one and not more than [2] two approved headlamps.  Every [motor cycle] motorcycle equipped with a side car or other attachment shall be equipped with a lamp on the outside limit of [such] the attachment, which lamp is capable of displaying a white light to the front. b.    The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall not issue a registration certificate for a motor vehicle if any headlamp on the motor vehicle exceeds 2,513 lumens.  However, this subsection shall not apply to motor vehicles that were registered in the State prior to the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) or to any motor vehicles available for sale at a motor vehicle dealership in the State as of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf:  P.L.1964, c.136, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following enactment. However, the chief administrator may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the timely implementation of this act.